Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.10.070

Fees.

The agency shall establish fees by rule at a level necessary to approximately recover the staffing costs incurred in administering this chapter. All fees collected under this section shall be deposited in the state general fund.

[ 1986 c 299 s 7.]